Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-287
Irrigation water reuse pit; reusing ground water; exempt from certain provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person intending to or in the process of reusing ground water from an irrigation water reuse pit located within an ephemeral natural stream shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 46, article 2, which would otherwise apply to such pits, and from the provisions of section 46-637.

Laws 1980, LB 908, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB798, § 3.